District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-1746

Registration and certification required for resident managers.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-209, § 10a
as added Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-117, § 2(h), 31 DCR 4023
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1233(j), 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1929.1.